Illinois, session 104th, SB3417.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1008 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1008)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1008)7    Sec. 5-1008. Home Rule County Use Tax. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "Department" means the 9Department of Revenue.10    (b) The corporate authorities of a home rule county may 11impose a tax upon the privilege of using, in such county, any 12item of tangible personal property which is purchased at 13retail from a retailer, and which is titled or registered to a 14purchaser residing within the corporate limits of such home 15rule county with an agency of this State's government, at a 16rate which is an increment of 1/4% and based on the selling 17price of such tangible personal property, as "selling price" 18is defined in the "Use Tax Act", approved July 14, 1955, as 19amended. Such tax shall be collected from persons whose 20Illinois address for titling or registration purposes is given 21as being in such county. Except as provided in subsection (c), 22such Such tax shall be collected by the county imposing such 23tax.  SB3417- 2 -LRB104 18332 RTM 31772 b1    (c) If a home rule county imposes a tax under subsection 2(b), then the tax shall be collected by the Department if the 3property is purchased at retail from a retailer in any county 4in this State other than the home rule county imposing the tax. 5The tax shall be remitted to the State or an exemption 6determination must be obtained from the Department before the 7title or certificate of registration for the property may be 8issued. The tax or proof of exemption may be transmitted to the 9Department by way of the State agency or State officer that the 10tangible personal property must be titled or registered if the 11Department and that State agency or State officer determine 12that this procedure shall expedite the processing of 13applications for title or registration.14    The Department shall have full power to administer and 15enforce this Section, to collect all taxes, penalties, and 16interest due under this Section, to dispose of taxes, 17penalties, and interest collected under this Section, and 18determine all rights to credit memoranda or refunds arising on 19account of the erroneous payment of tax, penalty, or interest. 20In the administration of and compliance with this Section, the 21Department and persons who are subject to this Section shall 22have the same rights, remedies, privileges, immunities, 23powers, and duties, and be subject to the same conditions, 24restrictions, limitations, penalties, and definitions of 25terms, and employ the same modes of procedure as are 26prescribed in the Use Tax Act, except the definition of the   SB3417- 3 -LRB104 18332 RTM 31772 b1"retailer maintaining a place of business in this State" and 2provisions pertaining to the State rate of tax, and the 3Uniform Penalty and Interest Act that are consistent with this 4Section as fully as if the Use Tax Act and the Uniform Penalty 5and Interest Act were set forth herein.6    If the Department determines that a refund shall be made 7under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a credit 8memorandum, then the Department shall notify the State 9Comptroller, who shall cause the order to be drawn for the 10amount specified, and to the person named, in the notification 11from the Department. The refund shall be paid by the State 12Treasurer out of the Home Rule County Retailers' Occupation 13Tax Fund.14    As soon as practicable, the Department shall pay over to 15the State Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, for deposit into 16the Home Rule County Retailers' Occupation Tax Fund, all 17taxes, penalties, and interest collected under this Section. 18On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 19Department shall prepare and certify to the State Comptroller 20the disbursement of stated sums of money to named counties, 21the county in each instance to be that county for which the 22Department, during the second preceding calendar month, 23collected county use tax from any person whose Illinois 24address for titling or registration purposes is given as being 25in the county. The amount to be paid to each county shall be 26the amount, not including credit memoranda, collected under   SB3417- 4 -LRB104 18332 RTM 31772 b1this Section during the second preceding calendar month by the 2Department, and not including an amount equal to the amount of 3refunds made during the second preceding calendar month by the 4Department on behalf of the county, less 2% of the remainder, 5which the Department shall pay into the Tax Compliance and 6Administration Fund. The Department, at the time of each 7monthly disbursement to the counties, shall prepare and 8certify to the State Comptroller the amount to be paid into the 9Tax Compliance and Administration Fund under this Section. 10Within 10 days after receipt by the State Comptroller of the 11disbursement certification to the counties and the Tax 12Compliance and Administration Fund under this Section to be 13given to the State Comptroller by the Department, the State 14Comptroller shall cause the orders to be drawn for the 15respective amounts in accordance with the directions contained 16in that certification.17    A certified copy of an ordinance imposing or discontinuing 18the tax to be collected and enforced by the Department under 19this Section shall be adopted and filed with the Department. 20If the county files a certified copy of the ordinance with the 21Department on or before April 1, then the Department shall 22proceed to administer and enforce this Section on behalf of 23the county on July 1 next following the adoption and filing of 24the ordinance with the Department. If the county files a 25certified copy of the ordinance with the Department on or 26before October 1, then the Department shall proceed to   SB3417- 5 -LRB104 18332 RTM 31772 b1administer and enforce this Section on behalf of the county as 2of January 1 next following the adoption and filing the 3ordinance with the Department. No ordinance may be filed with 4the Department under this subsection before the effective date 5of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The 6Department shall not begin collection and enforcement under 7this subsection (b) before January 1, 2027.8    Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a home rule 9county from collecting a tax imposed under subsection (b) if 10the tax is not collected by the Department. 11    (d) This Section shall be known and may be cited as the 12"Home Rule County Use Tax Law".13(Source: P.A. 91-51, eff. 6-30-99.)